Hawaii, session 2025, SB853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 207, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, established an immigration services and access unit within the office of community services to assist the office in achieving its mandate of serving low-income individuals, immigrants, and refugees.  As the State is comprised of a significant immigrant population and families with mixed immigration statuses, providing additional support for immigrants will ensure timely access to services and minimal disruption to the lives of individuals who have pending immigration proceedings. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish an immigration services trust fund to provide continued support to the office of community services for immigration-related matters. SECTION 2.  Chapter 371K, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§371K-    Immigration services trust fund.  (a)  There is established the immigration services trust fund into which shall be deposited: (1)  Appropriations made by the legislature; (2)  Any moneys received from grants, donations, or the proceeds from contributions; and (3)  The interest or return on investments earned from moneys in the trust fund. (b)  The immigration services trust fund shall be administered by the department of labor and industrial relations and used for the purposes of the immigration services and access unit within the office of community services. (c)  The department of labor and industrial relations shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session to provide an accounting of the receipts and expenditures of the fund." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the immigration services trust fund. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of labor and industrial relations for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________